native-src/hyphen-2.8.3/hyph_en_US.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 3
.ac8a8d9e9m8y.
.ac8a8d9e9m8i8e8s.
.ac9c8u9s8a9t8i8v8e.
.ac8r8o9n8y8m.
.ac8r8y8l9a8m8i8d8e.
.ac8r8y8l9a8m8i8d8e8s.
.ac8r8y8l9a8l8d8e9h8y8d8e.
.ad8d9a9b8l8e.
.ad8d9i9b8l8e.
.ad8r8e8n9a9l8i8n8e.
.ae8r8o9s8p8a8c8e.
.af9t8e8r9t8h8o8u8g8h8t.
.af9t8e8r9t8h8o8u8g8h8t8s.
.ag8r8o8n9o9m8i8s8t.
.ag8r8o8n9o9m8i8s8t8s.
.al9g8e9b8r8a9i9c8a8l9l8y.
.am9p8h8e8t9a9m8i8n8e.
.am9p8h8e8t9a9m8i8n8e8s.
.an9a9l8y8s8e.
.an9a9l8y8s8e8d.
.an8a8l8y9s8e8s.
.an9i8s8o9t8r8o8p9i8c.
.an9i8s8o9t8r8o8p9i9c8a8l9l8y.
.an9i8s8o8t9r8o9p8i8s8m.
.an9i8s8o8t9r8o8p8y.
.an8o8m9a8l8y.
.an8o8m9a8l8i8e8s.
.an8t8i9d8e8r8i8v9a9t8i8v8e.
.an8t8i9d8e8r8i8v9a9t8i8v8e8s.
.an8t8i9h8o8l8o9m8o8r9p8h8i8c.
.an9t8i8n9o9m8y.
.an9t8i8n9o9m8i8e8s.
.an9t8i9n8u9c8l8e8a8r.
.an9t8i9n8u9c8l8e9o8n.
.an9t8i9r8e8v9o9l8u9t8i8o8n9a8r8y.
.ap8o8t8h9e9o9s8e8s.
.ap8o8t8h9e9o9s8i8s.
.ap9p8e8n9d8i8x.
.ar9c8h8i9m8e9d8e8a8n.
.ar9c8h8i9p8e8l9a8g8o.
.ar9c8h8i9p8e8l9a9g8o8s.
.ar9c8h8i8v8e.
.ar9c8h8i8v8e8s.
.ar9c8h8i8v9i8n8g.
.ar9c8h8i8v9i8s8t.
.ar9c8h8i8v9i8s8t8s.
.ar9c8h8e9t8y8p9a8l.
.ar9c8h8e9t8y8p9i9c8a8l.
.ar8c9t8a8n9g8e8n8t.
.ar8c9t8a8n9g8e8n8t8s.
.as9s8i8g8n9a9b8l8e.
.as9s8i8g8n9o8r.
.as9s8i8g8n9o8r8s.
.as9s8i8s8t9a8n8t9s8h8i8p.
.as9s8i8s8t9a8n8t9s8h8i8p8s.
.as8y8m8p9t8o9m8a8t8i8c.
.as9y8m8p9t8o8t9i8c.
.as8y8n9c8h8r8o9n8o8u8s.
.at8h9e8r9o9s8c8l8e9r8o9s8i8s.
.at9m8o8s9p8h8e8r8e.
.at9m8o8s9p8h8e8r8e8s.
.at9t8r8i8b9u8t8e8d.
.at9t8r8i8b9u8t9a8b8l8e.
.au9t8o9m8a9t8i8o8n.
.au9t8o8m9a9t8o8n.
.au9t8o8m9a9t8a.
.au9t8o9n8u8m9b8e8r9i8n8g.
.au9t8o8n9o9m8o8u8s.
.au8t8o9r8o8u8n8d9i8n8g.
.av9o8i8r9d8u9p8o8i8s.
.ba8n8d9l8e8a8d8e8r.
.ba8n8d9l8e8a8d8e8r8s.
.ba8n8k9r8u8p8t.
.ba8n8k9r8u8p8t9c8y.
.ba8n8k9r8u8p8t9c8i8e8s.
.ba8r9o8n8i8e8s.
.ba8s8e9l8i8n8e9s8k8i8p.
.ba9t8h8y8m9e9t8r8y.
.ba8t8h8y9s8c8a8p8h8e.
.be8a8n9i8e8s.
.be9h8a8v9i8o8u8r.
.be9h8a8v9i8o8u8r8s.
.be8v8i8e8s.
.bi8b9l8i9o8g9r8a9p8h8y9s8t8y8l8e.
.bi9d8i8f9f8e8r9e8n9t8i8a8l.
.bi8g9g8e8s8t.
.bi8l8l9a8b8l8e.
.bi8o9m8a8t8h9e9m8a8t9i8c8s.
.bi8o9m8e8d9i9c8a8l.
.bi8o9m8e8d9i9c8i8n8e.
.bi8o9r8h8y8t8h8m8s.
.bi8t9m8a8p.
.bi8t9m8a8p8s.
.bl8a8n8d9e8r.
.bl8a8n8d9e8s8t.
.bl8i8n8d9e8r.
.bl8o8n8d8e8s.
.bl8u8e9p8r8i8n8t.
.bl8u8e9p8r8i8n8t8s.
.bo9l8o8m9e9t8e8r.
.bo8o8k9s8e8l8l9e8r.
.bo8o8k9s8e8l8l9e8r8s.
.bo8o8l9e8a8n.
.bo8o8l9e8a8n8s.
.bo8r9n8o9l8o8g9i9c8a8l.
.bo8t9u9l8i8s8m.
.br8u8s8q8u8e8r.
.bu8f9f8e8r.
.bu8f9f8e8r8s.
.bu8s8i8e8r.
.bu8s8i8e8s8t.
.bu8s8s8i8n8g.
.bu8t8t8e8d.
.bu8z8z9w8o8r8d.
.bu8z8z9w8o8r8d8s.
.ca9c8o8p8h9o9n8y.
.ca9c8o8p8h9o9n8i8e8s.
.ca8l8l9e8r.
.ca8l8l9e8r8s.
.ca8m9e8r8a9m8e8n.
.ca8r8t9w8h8e8e8l.
.ca8r8t9w8h8e8e8l8s.
.ca9t8a8r8r8h8s.
.ca8t9a9s8t8r8o8p8h9i8c.
.ca8t9a9s8t8r8o8p8h9i9c8a8l8l8y.
.ca8t9e9n8o8i8d.
.ca8t9e9n8o8i8d8s.
.ca8u9l8i9f8l8o8w9e8r.
.ch8a8p9a8r9r8a8l.
.ch8a8r9t8r8e8u8s8e.
.ch8e8m8o9t8h8e8r9a8p8y.
.ch8e8m8o9t8h8e8r9a9p8i8e8s.
.ch8l8o8r8o9m8e8t8h9a8n8e.
.ch8l8o8r8o9m8e8t8h9a8n8e8s.
.ch8o9l8e8s9t8e8r8i8c.
.ci8g9a9r8e8t8t8e.
.ci8g9a9r8e8t8t8e8s.
.ci8n8q8u8e9f8o8i8l.
.co9a8s8s8o9c8i8a9t8i8v8e.
.co9g8n8a8c.
.co9g8n8a8c8s.
.co9k8e8r9n8e8l.
.co9k8e8r9n8e8l8s.
.co8l9l8i8n9e8a9t8i8o8n.
.co8l9u8m8n8s.
.co8m9p8a8r9a8n8d.
.co8m9p8a8r9a8n8d8s.
.co8m9p8e8n9d8i8u8m.
.co8m9p8o9n8e8n8t9w8i8s8e.
.co8m8p9t8r8o8l9l8e8r.
.co8m8p9t8r8o8l9l8e8r8s.
.co8n9f8o8r8m9a8b8l8e.
.co8n9f8o8r8m9i8s8t.
.co8n9f8o8r8m9i8s8t8s.
.co8n9f8o8r8m9i8t8y.
.co8n9g8r8e8s8s.
.co8n9g8r8e8s8s8e8s.
.co8n9t8r8i8b9u8t8e.
.co8n9t8r8i8b9u8t8e8s.
.co8n9t8r8i8b9u8t8e8d.
.co9r8e9l8a9t8i8o8n.
.co9r8e9l8a9t8i8o8n8s.
.co9r8e9l8i9g8i8o8n9i8s8t.
.co9r8e9l8i9g8i8o8n9i8s8t8s.
.co9r8e9o8p9s8i8s.
.co9r8e9s8p8o8n9d8e8n8t.
.co9r8e9s8p8o8n9d8e8n8t8s.
.co9s8e9c8a8n8t.
.co9t8a8n9g8e8n8t.
.co8u8r9s8e8s.
.co9w8o8r8k9e8r.
.co9w8o8r8k9e8r8s.
.cr8a8n8k9c8a8s8e.
.cr8a8n8k9s8h8a8f8t.
.cr8o8c9o9d8i8l8e.
.cr8o8c9o9d8i8l8e8s.
.cr8o8s8s9h8a8t8c8h.
.cr8o8s8s9h8a8t8c8h8e8d.
.cr8o8s8s9o8v8e8r.
.cr8y8p9t8o9g8r8a8m.
.cr8y8p9t8o9g8r8a8m8s.
.cu8f8f9l8i8n8k.
.cu8f8f9l8i8n8k8s.
.cu9n8e8i9f8o8r8m.
.cu8s9t8o8m9i8z9a9b8l8e.
.cu8s9t8o8m9i8z8e.
.cu8s9t8o8m9i8z8e8s.
.cu8s9t8o8m9i8z8e8d.
.da8c8h8s9h8u8n8d.
.da8m9s8e8l9f8l8y.
.da8m9s8e8l9f8l8i8e8s.
.da8c8t8y8l9o9g8r8a8m.
.da8c8t8y8l9o9g8r8a8p8h.
.da8t8a9b8a8s8e.
.da8t8a9b8a8s8e8s.
.da8t8a9p8a8t8h.
.da8t8a9p8a8t8h8s.
.da8t8e9s8t8a8m8p.
.da8t8e9s8t8a8m8p8s.
.de9c8l8a8r9a8b8l8e.
.de9f8i8n9i9t8i8v8e.
.de9l8e8c9t8a9b8l8e.
.de8m8i9s8e8m8i9q8u8a9v8e8r.
.de8m8i9s8e8m8i9q8u8a9v8e8r8s.
.de9m8o8c9r8a9t8i8s8m.
.de8m8o8s.
.de9r8i8v9a9t8i8v8e.
.de9r8i8v9a9t8i8v8e8s.
.di8a9l8e8c9t8i8c.
.di8a9l8e8c9t8i8c8s.
.di8a9l8e8c9t8i9c8i8a8n.
.di8a9l8e8c9t8i9c8i8a8n8s.
.di9c8h8l8o8r8o9m8e8t8h9a8n8e.
.di8f9f8r8a8c8t.
.di8f9f8r8a8c8t8s.
.di8f9f8r8a8c9t8i8o8n.
.di8f9f8r8a8c9t8i8o8n8s.
.di8r8e8r.
.di8r8e9n8e8s8s.
.di8s9p8a8r9a8n8d.
.di8s9p8a8r9a8n8d8s.
.di8s9t8r8a8u8g8h8t9l8y.
.di8s9t8r8i8b9u8t8e.
.di8s9t8r8i8b9u8t8e8s.
.di8s9t8r8i8b9u8t8e8d.
.do8u9b8l8e9s8p8a8c8e.
.do8u9b8l8e9s8p8a8c9i8n8g.
.do8l8l9i8s8h.
.dr8i8f8t9a8g8e.
.dr8i8v9e8r8s.
.dr8o8m9e9d8a8r8y.
.dr8o8m9e9d8a8r8i8e8s.
.du9o8p9o9l8i8s8t.
.du9o8p9o9l8i8s8t8s.
.du9o8p9o8l8y.
.dy8s9l8e8x8i8a.
.dy8s9l8e8c9t8i8c.
.ea8s8t9e8n8d9e8r8s.
.ec8o9n8o8m9i8c8s.
.ec8o8n9o9m8i8s8t.
.ec8o8n9o9m8i8s8t8s.
.ei9g8e8n9c8l8a8s8s.
.ei9g8e8n9c8l8a8s8s8e8s.
.ei9g8e8n9v8a8l9u8e.
.ei9g8e8n9v8a8l9u8e8s.
.el8e8c8t8r8o9m8e8c8h8a8n9i9c8a8l.
.el8e8c8t8r8o9m8e8c8h8a8n8o9a8c8o8u8s8t8i8c.
.el8i8t9i8s8t.
.el8i8t9i8s8t8s.
.en9t8r8e9p8r8e9n8e8u8r.
.en9t8r8e9p8r8e9n8e8u8r9i8a8l.
.ep9i9n8e8p8h9r8i8n8e.
.eq8u8i9v8a8r8i9a8n8t.
.eq8u8i9v8a8r8i9a8n8c8e.
.et8h9a8n8e.
.et8h9y8l9e8n8e.
.ev8e8r9s8i9b8l8e.
.ev8e8r8t.
.ev8e8r8t8s.
.ev8e8r8t9e8d.
.ev8e8r8t9i8n8g.
.ex9q8u8i8s9i8t8e.
.ex9t8r8a9o8r9d8i9n8a8r8y.
.fa8l8l9i8n8g.
.fe8r8m8i9o8n8s.
.fi9n8i8t8e9l8y.
.fl8a9g8e8l9l8u8m.
.fl8a9g8e8l9l8a.
.fl8a8m9m8a9b8l8e8s.
.fl8e8d8g9l8i8n8g.
.fl8o8w9c8h8a8r8t.
.fl8o8w9c8h8a8r8t8s.
.fl8u8o8r8o9c8a8r9b8o8n.
.fo8r9m8i9d8a9b8l8e.
.fo8r9m8i9d8a9b8l8y.
.fo8r9s8y8t8h9i8a.
.fo8r8t8h9r8i8g8h8t.
.fr8e8e9l8o8a8d8e8r.
.fr8e8e9l8o8a8d8e8r8s.
.fr8i8e8n8d9l8i8e8r.
.fr8i9v8o8l9i8t8y.
.fr8i9v8o8l9i9t8i8e8s.
.fr8i8v9o9l8o8u8s.
.ga9l8a8c9t8i8c.
.ga8l9a8x8y.
.ga8l9a8x9i8e8s.
.ga8s9o8m9e9t8e8r.
.ge9o9d8e8s9i8c.
.ge9o9d8e8t9i8c.
.ge8o9m8e8t9r8i8c.
.ge8o9m8e8t9r8i8c8s.
.ge9o9s8t8r8o8p8h8i8c.
.ge8o9t8h8e8r9m8a8l.
.ge9o8t9r8o9p8i8s8m.
.gn8o9m8o8n.
.gn8o9m8o8n8s.
.gr8a8n8d9u8n8c8l8e.
.gr8a8n8d9u8n8c8l8e8s.
.gr8i8e8v9a8n8c8e.
.gr8i8e8v9a8n8c8e8s.
.gr8i8e8v9o8u8s.
.gr8i8e8v9o8u8s9l8y.
.ha8i8r9s8t8y8l8e.
.ha8i8r9s8t8y8l8e8s.
.ha8i8r9s8t8y8l9i8s8t.
.ha8i8r9s8t8y8l9i8s8t8s.
.ha8l8f9s8p8a8c8e.
.ha8l8f9s8p8a8c8e8s.
.ha8l8f9w8a8y.
.ha8r9b8i8n9g8e8r.
.ha8r9b8i8n9g8e8r8s.
.ha8r9l8e9q8u8i8n.
.ha8r9l8e9q8u8i8n8s.
.ha8t8c8h9e8r8i8e8s.
.he8m8i9d8e8m8i9s8e8m8i9q8u8a9v8e8r.
.he8m8i9d8e8m8i9s8e8m8i9q8u8a9v8e8r8s.
.he9m8o9g8l8o9b8i8n.
.he9m8o9p8h8i8l9i8a.
.he9m8o9p8h8i8l9i8a8c.
.he9m8o9p8h8i8l9i8a8c8s.
.he8m8o9r8h8e9o8l9o8g8y.
.he9p8a8t9i8c.
.he8r9m8a8p8h9r8o9d8i8t8e.
.he8r9m8a8p8h9r8o9d8i8t9i8c.
.he9r8o8e8s.
.he8x8a9d8e8c9i9m8a8l.
.ho9l8o9n8o9m8y.
.ho9m8e8o9m8o8r9p8h8i8c.
.ho9m8e8o9m8o8r9p8h8i8s8m.
.ho9m8o9t8h8e8t8i8c.
.ho8r8s8e9r8a8d9i8s8h.
.ho8t9b8e8d.
.ho8t9b8e8d8s.
.hy9d8r8o9t8h8e8r9m8a8l.
.hy9p8o9t8h8a8l9a9m8u8s.
.id8e8a8l8s.
.id8e8o9g8r8a8p8h8s.
.id8i8o9s8y8n9c8r8a8s8y.
.id8i8o9s8y8n9c8r8a9s8i8e8s.
.id8i8o9s8y8n9c8r8a8t8i8c.
.id8i8o9s8y8n9c8r8a8t9i9c8a8l9l8y.
.ig9n8i8t9e8r.
.ig9n8i8t9e8r8s.
.ig9n8i9t8o8r.
.ig8n8o8r8e9s8p8a8c8e8s.
.im9p8e8d9a8n8c8e.
.im9p8e8d9a8n8c8e8s.
.in9d8u9b8i9t8a9b8l8e.
.in9f8i8n9i8t8e9l8y.
.in9f8i8n9i9t8e8s9i9m8a8l.
.in9f8r8a9s8t8r8u8c9t8u8r8e.
.in9f8r8a9s8t8r8u8c9t8u8r8e8s.
.in9s8t8a8l8l9e8r.
.in9s8t8a8l8l9e8r8s.
.in9t8e8r9d8i8s9c8i9p8l8i9n8a8r8y.
.in9t8e8r9g8a9l8a8c9t8i8c.
.in9u8t8i8l8e.
.in9u8t8i8l9i9t8y.
.ir9r8e9d8u8c9i8b8l8e.
.ir9r8e9d8u8c9i8b8l8y.
.ir9r8e8v9o9c8a9b8l8e.
.is8o8t9r8o8p8y.
.is8o9t8r8o8p9i8c.
.it8i8n9e8r9a8r8y.
.it8i8n9e8r9a8r9i8e8s.
.je9r8e9m8i9a8d8s.
.ke8y9n8o8t8e.
.ke8y9n8o8t8e8s.
.ke8y9s8t8r8o8k8e.
.ke8y9s8t8r8o8k8e8s.
.ki8l8n9i8n8g.
.la8c9i9e8s8t.
.la8m9e8n9t8a9b8l8e.
.la8n8d9s8c8a8p9e8r.
.la8n8d9s8c8a8p9e8r8s.
.la8r9c8e9n8y.
.la8r9c8e9n9i8s8t.
.le8a8f9h8o8p9p8e8r.
.le8a8f9h8o8p9p8e8r8s.
.le8t9t8e8r9s8p8a8c9i8n8g.
.li8f8e9s8p8a8n.
.li8f8e9s8p8a8n8s.
.li8f8e9s8t8y8l8e.
.li8f8e9s8t8y8l8e8s.
.li8g8h8t9w8e8i8g8h8t.
.li8m9o8u9s8i8n8e8s.
.li8n8e9b8a8c8k8e8r.
.li8n8e9s8p8a8c8i8n8g.
.li9o8n9e8s8s.
.li8t8h9o9g8r8a8p8h8e8d.
.li8t8h9o9g8r8a8p8h8s.
.lo9b8o8t9o8m8y.
.lo9b8o8t9o8m9i8z8e.
.lo8g8e8s.
.lo8n8g9e8s8t.
.lo9q8u8a8c9i8t8y.
.lo8v8e9s8t8r8u8c8k.
.ma8c8r8o9e8c8o9n8o8m8i8c8s.
.ma8l9a9p8r8o8p9i8s8m.
.ma8l9a9p8r8o8p9i8s8m8s.
.ma8n9s8l8a8u8g8h9t8e8r.
.ma8n9u9s8c8r8i8p8t.
.ma8r9g8i8n9a8l.
.ma8t8h9e9m8a9t8i9c8i8a8n.
.ma8t8h9e9m8a9t8i9c8i8a8n8s.
.ma8t8t8e8s.
.me8d9i8c9a8i8d.
.me8d8i9o8c8r8e.
.me8d8i9o8c9r8i9t8i8e8s.
.me8g8a9l8i8t8h.
.me8g8a9l8i8t8h8s.
.me8t8a9b8o8l9i8c.
.me9t8a8b9o9l8i8s8m.
.me9t8a8b9o9l8i8s8m8s.
.me9t8a8b9o9l8i8t8e.
.me9t8a8b9o9l8i8t8e8s.
.me8t8a9l8a8n9g8u8a8g8e.
.me8t8a9l8a8n9g8u8a8g8e8s.
.me8t8a9p8h8o8r9i8c.
.me8t8h9a8n8e.
.me9t8r8o8p9o9l8i8s.
.me9t8r8o8p9o9l8i8s8e8s.
.me8t9r8o9p8o8l9i9t8a8n.
.me8t9r8o9p8o8l9i9t8a8n8s.
.mi8c8r8o9e8c8o9n8o8m8i8c8s.
.mi9c8r8o9f8i8c8h8e.
.mi9c8r8o9f8i8c8h8e8s.
.mi8c8r8o9o8r8g8a8n9i8s8m.
.mi8c8r8o9o8r8g8a8n9i8s8m8s.
.mi8l8l9a8g8e.
.mi8l9l8i9l8i8t8e8r.
.mi8m8e8o9g8r8a8p8h8e8d.
.mi8m8e8o9g8r8a8p8h8s.
.mi8m9i8c9r8i8e8s.
.mi8n9i8s.
.mi8n8i9s8y8m9p8o9s8i8u8m.
.mi8n8i9s8y8m9p8o9s8i8a.
.mi9n8u8t9e8r.
.mi9n8u8t9e8s8t.
.mi8s9c8h8i8e9v8o8u8s9l8y.
.mi9s8e8r8s.
.mi9s8o8g9a9m8y.
.mo8d9e8l9l8i8n8g.
.mo8l9e9c8u8l8e.
.mo8l9e9c8u8l8e8s.
.mo8n9a8r8c8h8s.
.mo8n8e8y9l8e8n9d8e8r.
.mo8n8e8y9l8e8n9d8e8r8s.
.mo8n8o9c8h8r8o8m8e.
.mo8n8o9e8n9e8r9g8e8t8i8c.
.mo8n9o8i8d.
.mo8n8o9p8o8l8e.
.mo8n8o9p8o8l8e8s.
.mo9n8o8p9o8l8y.
.mo8n8o9s8p8l8i8n8e.
.mo8n8o9s8p8l8i8n8e8s.
.mo8n8o9s8t8r8o8f8i8c.
.mo9n8o8t9o9n8i8e8s.
.mo9n8o8t9o9n8o8u8s.
.mo9r8o8n9i8s8m.
.mo8s9q8u8i9t8o.
.mo8s9q8u8i9t8o8s.
.mo8s9q8u8i9t8o8e8s.
.mu8d9r8o8o8m.
.mu8d9r8o8o8m8s.
.mu8l9t8i9f8a8c9e8t8e8d.
.mu8l9t8i9p8l8i8c9a8b8l8e.
.mu8l8t8i9u8s8e8r.
.ne8o9f8i8e8l8d8s.
.ne8o9n8a8z8i.
.ne8o9n8a8z8i8s.
.ne8p8h9e8w8s.
.ne8p8h9r8i8t8e.
.ne8p8h9r8i8t8i8c.
.ne8w9e8s8t.
.ne8w8s9l8e8t9t8e8r.
.ne8w8s9l8e8t9t8e8r8s.
.ni8t8r8o9m8e8t8h9a8n8e.
.no9n8a8m8e.
.no8n9a8r9i8t8h9m8e8t9i8c.
.no8n9e8m8e8r9g8e8n8c8y.
.no8n9e8q8u8i9v8a8r8i9a8n8c8e.
.no8n8e9t8h8e9l8e8s8s.
.no8n9e8u8c8l8i8d9e8a8n.
.no8n9i8s8o9m8o8r9p8h8i8c.
.no8n9p8s8e8u8d8o9c8o8m9p8a8c8t.
.no8n9s8m8o8o8t8h.
.no8n9u8n8i9f8o8r8m.
.no8n9u8n8i9f8o8r8m9l8y.
.no8r9e8p9i9n8e8p8h9r8i8n8e.
.no8t9w8i8t8h9s8t8a8n8d9i8n8g.
.nu9c8l8e8o9t8i8d8e.
.nu9c8l8e8o9t8i8d8e8s.
.nu8t9c8r8a8c8k9e8r.
.nu8t9c8r8a8c8k9e8r8s.
.oe8r9s8t8e8d8s.
.of8f9l8i8n8e.
.of8f9l8o8a8d.
.of8f9l8o8a8d8s.
.of8f9l8o8a8d8e8d.
.ol8i9g8o8p9o9l8i8s8t.
.ol8i9g8o8p9o9l8i8s8t8s.
.ol8i9g8o8p9o8l8y.
.ol8i9g8o8p9o8l9i8e8s.
.op9e8r9a8n8d.
.op9e8r9a8n8d8s.
.or8a8n8g9u8t8a8n.
.or8a8n8g9u8t8a8n8s.
.or9t8h8o9d8o8n9t8i8s8t.
.or9t8h8o9d8o8n9t8i8s8t8s.
.or9t8h8o9k8e8r9a9t8o8l9o8g8y.
.or8t8h8o9n8i8t8r8o9t8o8l8u8e8n8e.
.ov8e8r9v8i8e8w.
.ov8e8r9v8i8e8w8s.
.ox9i8d9i8c.
.pa8d9d8i8n8g.
.pa8i8n9l8e8s8s9l8y.
.pa8l9e8t8t8e.
.pa8l9e8t8t8e8s.
.pa8r9a9b8o8l8a.
.pa8r9a9b8o8l9i8c.
.pa9r8a8b9o9l8o8i8d.
.pa8r9a9d8i8g8m.
.pa8r9a9d8i8g8m8s.
.pa8r8a9c8h8u8t8e.
.pa8r8a9c8h8u8t8e8s.
.pa8r8a9d8i9m8e8t8h8y8l9b8e8n8z8e8n8e.
.pa8r8a9f8l8u8o8r8o9t8o8l8u8e8n8e.
.pa8r8a9g8r8a8p8h9e8r.
.pa8r8a9l8e9g8a8l.
.pa8r9a8l9l8e8l9i8s8m.
.pa8r8a9m8a8g9n8e8t9i8s8m.
.pa8r8a9m8e8d8i8c.
.pa8r8a9m8e8t8h8y8l9a8n8i8s8o8l8e.
.pa9r8a8m9e9t8r8i8z8e.
.pa8r8a9m8i8l9i9t8a8r8y.
.pa8r8a9m8o8u8n8t.
.pa8t8h9o9g8e8n9i8c.
.pe8e8v9i8s8h.
.pe8e8v9i8s8h9n8e8s8s.
.pe8n9t8a9g8o8n.
.pe8n9t8a9g8o8n8s.
.pe9t8r8o9l8e9u8m.
.ph8e9n8o8m9e9n8o8n.
.ph8e8n8y8l9a8l8a9n8i8n8e.
.ph8i9l8a8t9e9l8i8s8t.
.ph8i9l8a8t9e9l8i8s8t8s.
.ph8o9n8e8m8e.
.ph8o9n8e8m8e8s.
.ph8o9n8e9m8i8c.
.ph8o8s9p8h8o8r9i8c.
.ph8o9t8o9g8r8a8p8h8s.
.ph8o9t8o9o8f8f9s8e8t.
.pi8c9a9d8o8r.
.pi8c9a9d8o8r8s.
.pi8p8e9l8i8n8e.
.pi8p8e9l8i8n8e8s.
.pi8p8e9l8i8n9i8n8g.
.pi9r8a9n8h8a8s.
.pl8a8c8a9b8l8e.
.pl8a8n8t9h8o8p9p8e8r.
.pl8a8n8t9h8o8p9p8e8r8s.
.pl8e8a8s9a8n8c8e.
.pl8u8g9i8n.
.pl8u8g9i8n8s.
.po8l9t8e8r9g8e8i8s8t.
.po8l8y9e8n8e.
.po8l8y9e8t8h9y8l9e8n8e.
.po9l8y8g9a9m8i8s8t.
.po9l8y8g9a9m8i8s8t8s.
